District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.07

Priority to residents.

Priority shall be given to tenant businesses owned by persons who are residents of the District.

History

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 8, 32 DCR 6334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2237.